Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-103
Magistrate, defined.

The term magistrate in this code, when not otherwise expressly stated, shall mean a judge of the county court or clerk magistrate.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 248, p. 782;

R.S.1913, § 8903;

C.S.1922, § 9924;

C.S.1929, § 29-103;

R.S.1943, § 29-103;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 161;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 47;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 27.

District judge is not included. Binfield v. State, 15 Neb. 484, 19 N.W. 607 (1884).